South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-13-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-13-20.  (A) The person appointed as administrative officer to the board of education and the person appointed superintendent of any school district shall meet the qualifications required and possess the superintendent certificate issued by the State Board of Education. (B) The board of education of any county and the board of trustees of any school district, however, may impose any additional qualifications which it may deem proper. For individuals not meeting the qualifications required by State Board of Education Regulations, the school district board of trustees may petition the State Board of Education to grant a modified district superintendent certificate. The initial modified district superintendent certification shall be issued for two years and may be extended annually at the request of the local school board based on successful performance reviews. This section shall not affect any person presently serving as county or district superintendent of education. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----